District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.81

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Application on effective date of subchapter.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 296, Pub. L. 87-569, § 81
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
Section 110 of the Act of Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 306, Pub. L. 87-569, provided that this chapter would take effect 180 days after Aug. 6, 1962.
1973 Ed., § 29-1081.
1981 Ed., § 29-582.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.81.